Idaho, session 2025, S1025.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1030, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1030. DEFINITIONS. As used in this section through section
33-1034, Idaho Code:
(1) "Assessment" means an examination or another objective evaluation
of a student's academic performance, academic engagement, or college or ca-
reer readiness.
(2) "Board" means the state board of education.
(3) "Eligible education expenses" means:
(a) Tuition and fees paid to a participating prekindergarten provider
or participating school prior to July 1, 2030, after which such tuition
and fees shall not be considered eligible education expenses pursuant
to this subsection;
(a) (b) Computer hardware, internet access, or other technological de-
vices or services that are primarily used to meet a participant's edu-
cational needs, which costs for devices or services are not to exceed
one thousand dollars ($1,000); however, expenses related to internet
access shall be subject to reimbursement pursuant to the provisions of
section 33-1031(2)(c), Idaho Code, and shall not be eligible for direct
payment through the grant distribution platform;
(b) (c) Textbooks, curriculum, or other instructional materials, in-
cluding educational software and applications;
(c) (d) Fees for national standardized assessments, advanced place-
ment examinations, examinations related to college or university ad-
missions, or industry-recognized certification examinations;
(d) (e) Therapies, including but not limited to occupational, behav-
ioral, physical, speech-language, and audiology therapies, or other
services or therapies specifically approved by the board;
(e) (f) Educational programs offered for a fee or pursuant to contract
by a school district, public charter school, or career technical educa-
tion program to any eligible student; however, the payment of such fees
on behalf of a student through the grant distribution platform shall


not cause such student to be counted for purposes of calculating public
school enrollment; or
(f) (g) Other education expenses and services as approved by the board,
but not including childcare, upon recommendation of the parent advisory
panel established pursuant to section 33-1032, Idaho Code.
(4) "Eligible student" means a full-time resident of Idaho as described
in section 63-3013, Idaho Code, who is five (5) three (3) to eighteen (18)
years of age.
(5) "Grant" means an award of one thousand dollars ($1,000) five thou-
sand dollars ($5,000), which must be used for eligible education expenses.
(6) "Grant distribution platform" means a digital platform through
which grant funds are transferred from the board to participant accounts.
(7) "Parent" means the parent or legal guardian of an eligible student
or a participant.
(8) "Participant" means an eligible student for whom a grant is awarded
under section 33-1031, Idaho Code.
(9) "Participating prekindergarten" means any program as defined in 20
U.S.C. 1161i-1 that is licensed by the Idaho department of health and welfare
pursuant to chapter 11, title 39, Idaho Code, that:
(a) Provides eligible services for more than six (6) individuals, other
than individuals who reside at the facility, who are three (3) to five
(5) years of age;
(b) Receives a fee, payment, or grant for providing eligible services
for any of the individuals; and
(c) Adheres to any applicable federal laws and regulations.
(10) "Participating school" means an Idaho nonpublic school that:
(a) Meets one (1) of the following qualifications:
(i) Is a secondary school accredited by an accrediting body rec-
ognized by the state board of education; or
(ii) Is an elementary school that creates and maintains a student
learning portfolio;
(b) Does not discriminate regarding student admission or enrollment
based on a student's or a parent's religion, disability, or race;
(c) Respects the dignity of others, acknowledges the right of others to
express differing opinions, and fosters and defends intellectual hon-
esty, freedom of inquiry and instruction, and freedom of speech and as-
sociation;
(d) Respects requests for reasonable accommodations, which means re-
quests by a student's parent or legal guardian requiring the school to
make its best effort to enable parents or legal guardians to exercise
their rights without substantial impact to staff and resources, in-
cluding employee working conditions, safety and supervision on school
premises for school activities, and the efficient allocation of ex-
penditures, while balancing the parental rights of parents and legal
guardians, the educational needs of other students, the academic and
behavioral impacts to a classroom, a teacher's workload, and the assur-
ance of the safe and efficient operations of the school;
(e) Maintains and provides enrollment and performance data for eligi-
ble students as required by the state department of education to verify
student enrollment and progress;


(f) Administers nationally normed achievement assessments or state
standardized tests, or both, at progressive grade levels to determine
student progress; and
(g) Requires the following individuals to submit to a criminal back-
ground and history check as described in section 33-130, Idaho Code:
(i) An employee who does not hold a current Idaho educator license
issued by the state department of education; and
(ii) All individuals who have unsupervised contact with students
in a K-12 setting.
(9) (11) "Program" means the empowering parents grant program estab-
lished by section 33-1031, Idaho Code.
(12) "Special needs student" means an eligible student three (3) to
twenty-one (21) years of age who is receiving services under an individual-
ized education program pursuant to section 33-2002, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 33-1031, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1031. EMPOWERING PARENTS GRANT PROGRAM. (1) There is hereby estab-
lished the empowering parents grant program, to be administered by the board
according to the provisions of this section. The purpose of the program is to
provide education grants for eligible students.
(2) In order to administer the program, the board:
(a) Shall create and administer, or designate a third party to create
and administer, a grant distribution platform;
(b) Shall establish a grant application process for parents;
(c) Shall establish provisions for the reimbursement of any eligi-
ble education expense for which reimbursement is required and di-
rect payment from the platform is not permitted pursuant to section
33-1030(3)(a) 33-1030(3)(b), Idaho Code;
(d) Shall establish an application process to designate participating
schools and participating prekindergarten providers;
(d) (e) Shall, subject to appropriation, award grants. Grant awards
shall be made in the following order of preference designated as fol-
lows:
(i) First to eligible students whose household has an adjusted
gross income under sixty thousand dollars ($60,000), as verified
by the Idaho state tax commission using the prior year's tax re-
turns. Notification of grant awards for students in this category
shall be made within thirty (30) days of application, and grant
funds shall be made available for participants' use as soon as
practicable, but no later than thirty (30) days after the notifi-
cation of a grant award;
(ii) Starting sixty (60) days after grant awards in a fiscal year
are made under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, to eligible
students whose household has an adjusted gross income under sev-
enty-five thousand dollars ($75,000), as verified by the Idaho
state tax commission using the prior year's tax returns; and
(iii) Starting sixty (60) days after grant awards in a fiscal year
are made under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, to all other


eligible students on a first-come, first-served basis until all
available funds are distributed; and
(i) Seventy-five percent (75%) for eligible students and eligi-
ble children whose household has an adjusted gross income under
sixty thousand dollars ($60,000), as verified by the Idaho state
tax commission using the prior year's tax returns;
(ii) Twenty percent (20%) for eligible students and eligible
children whose household has an adjusted gross income between
sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) and eighty thousand dollars
($80,000), as verified by the Idaho state tax commission using the
prior year's tax returns; and
(iii) Five percent (5%) for eligible students and eligible chil-
dren whose household has an adjusted gross income over eighty
thousand dollars ($80,000), as verified by the Idaho state tax
commission using the prior year's tax returns; and
(e) (f) May take such other actions as are necessary to implement and
enforce the provisions of this section.
(3) Prior to the award of a grant, the parent of a participant shall
agree to verify program compliance. The parent of a participant shall use
grant funds only for eligible education expenses. If a parent is found to
misuse grant funds, then neither the parent nor another parent of the student
living in the same household may apply for a grant in the future for any stu-
dent, provided that the parent may appeal the finding to the board.
(4) Grant funds shall be expended within three (3) years after they
are awarded. Any unused funds at the end of the three (3) year period shall
revert to the empowering parents grant program fund established in section
33-1034, Idaho Code. At any time before the three (3) year period ends, un-
used funds may be forfeited and transferred from the participant account to
the program fund.
(5) Grant awards per family shall be capped at three thousand dollars
($3,000) five thousand dollars ($5,000) per student with a cap of fifteen
thousand dollars ($15,000) per household, regardless of the number of eli-
gible students in the family.
SECTION 3. That Section 33-1032, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1032. PARENT ADVISORY PANEL. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Executive director" means the executive director of the office of
the state board of education.
(b) "Program funds" means funds distributed to parents pursuant to sec-
tion 33-1031, Idaho Code.
(2) There is hereby established in the office of the state board of
education a parent advisory panel, which shall make recommendations to the
board:
(a) As described in section 33-1030(3)(f) 33-1030(3)(g), Idaho Code;
and
(b) On how to implement, administer, and improve the program described
in section 33-1031, Idaho Code.
(3) The parent advisory panel shall consist of seven (7) members. Three
(3) members shall be appointed by the governor, two (2) members shall be ap-


pointed by the president pro tempore of the senate, and two (2) members shall
be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The members
must be parents of eligible students, with preference given to parents who
have applied for program funds or who, for the initial appointment of the
panel, have indicated their intent to apply for program funds. Members of
the panel shall represent different regions of the state. Members shall
serve one (1) year terms at the pleasure of their appointing authority and
may be reappointed if they meet the eligibility criteria described in this
subsection. The executive director or the executive director's designee
shall serve as the nonvoting chair of the parent advisory panel.
(4) At the request of the board, the parent advisory panel shall meet,
in person or virtually, to discuss and make recommendations as described in
subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If a parent appeals a finding that program funds were used for a pur-
pose other than eligible education expenses, then the panel shall meet to
consider the appeal and recommend a decision on the appeal to the board.
SECTION 4. That Section 33-1034, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1034. EMPOWERING PARENTS GRANT PROGRAM FUND. There is hereby es-
tablished in the state treasury the empowering parents grant program fund,
to be administered by the board. Moneys in the fund shall:
(1) Consist of the following:
(a) Legislative appropriations;
(b) Donations and contributions made to the fund; and
(c) Interest earned on idle moneys in the fund;
(2) Be continuously appropriated for the purpose described in subsec-
tion (3) of this section; and
(3) Be used to pay grants awarded under the empowering parents grant
program.
(1) Consist of legislative appropriations, donations and contribu-
tions made to the fund, and interest earned on idle moneys in the fund;
(2) Be continuously appropriated to pay grants awarded under the empow-
ering parents grant program; and
(3) Not exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in a given tax year.
SECTION 5. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.